src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection


!! Moksha language nouns inflect in cases.

!!!!!!!!!
!! NOUNS 
!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NTag
 N_ ;
LEXICON N_
+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+TYÄ: #;

LEXICON N_АВА_DIAL
+Dial+Err/Orth: N_АВА ;
LEXICON N_ОШ_DIAL
+Dial+Err/Orth: N_ОШ ;
LEXICON N_САРАЗ_DIAL
+Dial+Err/Orth: N_САРАЗ ;
LEXICON N_ОФТА_DIAL
+Dial+Err/Orth: N_ОФТА ;
LEXICON N_КАЛ_DIAL
+Dial+Err/Orth: N_КАЛ ;


LEXICON N_АВА
! ава:ава
+N: NMN_АВА ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_АВА-SG
! ава:ава
+N: NMN_АВА-SG ;

LEXICON N_АВА-PL
! ава:ава
+N: NMN_АВА-PL ;

!LEXICON N_АВА-SG/PL
! ава:ава
!+N: NMN_АВА-SG/PL ;

LEXICON N_ВАЛЬМЯ
! вальмя:вальмя
+N: NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ ;

LEXICON N_ВАЛЬМЯ-SG
! вальмя:вальмя
+N: NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ-SG ;

LEXICON N_ВАЛЬМЯ-PL
! вальмя:вальмя
+N: NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ-PL ;

LEXICON N_МОКША
! мокша:мокша
+N: NMN_МОКША ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_МОКША ;

LEXICON N_МОКША-SG
! мокша:мокша
+N: NMN_МОКША-SG ;

LEXICON N_МОКША-PL
! мокша:мокша
+N: NMN_МОКША-PL ;

LEXICON N_ПАКСЯ
! пакся:пакся
+N: NMN_ПАКСЯ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_ПАКСЯ ;

LEXICON N_ПАКСЯ-SG
! пакся:пакся
+N: NMN_ПАКСЯ-SG ;

LEXICON N_ПАКСЯ-PL
! пакся:пакся
+N: NMN_ПАКСЯ-PL ;


LEXICON N_АНДЫ !!= * @CODE@ анды:анды
+N: NMN_АНДЫ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_АНДЫ-SG
! анды:анды
+N: NMN_АВА-SG ;

LEXICON N_АНДЫ-PL
! анды:анды
+N: NMN_АВА-PL ;

LEXICON N_ОФТА !!= @CODE@ 
!!офта:офт
+N: NMN_ОФТА ;

LEXICON N_ОФТА-SG !!= @CODE@
+N: NMN_ОФТА-SG ;
LEXICON N_ОФТА-PL !!= @CODE@
+N: NMN_ОФТА-PL ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГА !!= @CODE@
!!панга:панг
 N_ОФТА ;

LEXICON N_ПИНГЕ !!= @CODE@
!пинге:пинг
+N:%{АОЕ%} NMN_АВА ;
 N_КАЛ ; !!= @CODE@ Ela, Ill, Ine, Par 
+N+Der/Dim+N:%{АОЕ%}%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ТИШЕ
! тише:тише
+N: NMN_ТИШЕ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ТИШЕ-SG
! тише:тише
+N: NMN_ТИШЕ-SG ;

LEXICON N_ТИШЕ-PL
! тише:тише
+N: NMN_ТИШЕ-PL ;

!LEXICON N_ТИШЕ-SG/PL
! тише:тише
!+N: NMN_ТИШЕ-SG/PL ;

LEXICON N_ПУЛА !!= @CODE@
!пула:пула
+N: NMN_ПУЛА ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%{АОЕ%}%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_КАРЮЦЬКЕ !!= @CODE@
!карюцьке:карюцьк
+N:%{АОЕ%} NMN_АВА ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%{АОЕ%}%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;
!€ карюцькат

LEXICON N_СЕЛЬМЕ !!= @CODE@
!сельме:сельме
+N: NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ОШ !!= @CODE@
!ош:ош
+N: NMN_ОШ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ОШ-PL
!ош:ош
+N: NMN_ОШ-PL ;

LEXICON N_САРАЗ !!= @CODE@
!ош:ош
+N: NMN_САРАЗ ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_САРАЗ-PL
!ош:ош
+N: NMN_САРАЗ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ВАЙ !!= @CODE@
 N_ВАЙ-SG ;
 N_ВАЙ-PL ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ВАЙ-SG
+N: NMN_ВАЙ-SG ;

LEXICON N_ВАЙ-PL
+N: NMN_ВАЙ-PL ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ !!= @CODE@
 N_КАЛ-SG ;
 N_КАЛ-PL ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-SG
+N: NMN_КАЛ-SG ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-PL
+N: NMN_КАЛ-PL ;

LEXICON N_КЯЛЬ !!= @CODE@
 N_КЯЛЬ-SG ;
 N_КЯЛЬ-PL ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_КЯЛЬ-SG
+N: NMN_КЯЛЬ-SG ;

LEXICON N_КЯЛЬ-PL
+N: NMN_КЯЛЬ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ПИНЕ !!= @CODE@
 N_ПИНЕ-SG ;
 N_ПИНЕ-PL ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_ПИНЕ-SG
+N: NMN_ПИНЕ-SG ;

LEXICON N_ПИНЕ-PL
+N: NMN_ПИНЕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_КЕЛУ !!= @CODE@
 N_КЕЛУ-SG ;
 N_КЕЛУ-PL ;
+N+Der/Dim+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА ;

LEXICON N_КЕЛУ-SG
+N: NMN_КЕЛУ-SG ;

LEXICON N_КЕЛУ-PL
+N: NMN_КЕЛУ-PL ;




!! NMN

LEXICON NMN_АВА
!	NMN_АВА-SG	;
!	NMN_АВА-PL	;
!	NMN_АВА-SG/PL	;
	NMN-SG	;
	NMN-PL	;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_АВА-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
 	NMN-SG ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_АВА-PL
	NMN-PL ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_ПУЛА
!	NMN_ПУЛА-SG	;
!	NMN_ПУЛА-PL	;
!	NMN_ПУЛА-SG/PL	;
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
:%^А2О	NMN-SG	;
:%^А2О	NMN-PL	;
:%^А2О	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_у ;

LEXICON NMN_ПУЛА-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
:%^А2О 	NMN-SG ;
:%^А2О	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ПУЛА-PL
	NMN-PL ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_ТИШЕ
!	NMN_ТИШЕ-SG	;
!	NMN_ТИШЕ-PL	;
!	NMN_ТИШЕ-SG/PL	;
	NMN-SG	;
	NMN-PL	;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ТИШЕ-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
 	NMN-SG ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ТИШЕ-PL
	NMN-PL ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ
!	NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ-SG	;
!	NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ-PL	;
!	NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ-SG/PL	;
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
:%^Е2О	NMN-SG	;
:%^Е2О	NMN-PL	;
:%^Е2О	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_у ;

LEXICON NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
:%^Е2О 	NMN-SG ;
:%^Е2О	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_СЕЛЬМЕ-PL
	NMN-PL ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG  ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-PL  ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^Я2А SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^Я2А SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ВАЛЬМЯ-PL
:%^Я2А        NMN-PL ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_МОКША
:%^А2Е        NMN-SG  ;
:%^А2Е        NMN-PL  ;
:%^А2Е        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^А2Е SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_МОКША-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
:%^А2Е        NMN-SG ;
:%^А2Е        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^А2Е SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_МОКША-PL
:%^А2Е        NMN-PL ;
:%^А2Е        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_ПАКСЯ
        NMN-SG  ;
        NMN-PL  ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ПАКСЯ-SG
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ПАКСЯ-PL
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_ОФТА !!= @CODE@
!!офта:офт
NMN-SG ;
NMN-PL ;
NMN-SG/PL   ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-SG ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-PL ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-SG/PL   ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_в ;

LEXICON NMN_ОФТА-SG !!= @CODE@
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%{АОЕ%}%>вок K ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-SG ;
	 NMN-SG ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-SG/PL   ;
	 NMN-SG/PL   ;
+Der/Dim+N:%{АОЕ%}%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА-SG ;

LEXICON NMN_ОФТА-PL !!= @CODE@
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-PL ;
	 NMN-PL ;
:%{АОЕ%} NMN-SG/PL   ;
         NMN-SG/PL   ;
+Der/Dim+N:%{АОЕ%}%>%{DIM%}я NMN_АВА-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_КЕЛУ
	NMN_КЕЛУ-SG	;
	NMN_КЕЛУ-PL	;
	NMN_КЕЛУ-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_КЕЛУ-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM ;
!! Definite Sg
! SGCXDEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_КЕЛУ-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_КЕЛУ-PL
!! Indefinite
!+Pl:в PL-NOM ;
!! Definite Pl
!+Pl:в PLCXDEF ;
+Pl:в        NMN-PL       ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_КЕЛУ-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_КЕЛУ-SG/PL
:в NOTDEF-GEN ;
 NOTDEF-DAT ;
 NOTDEF-ABL ;
 NOTDEF-ILL ;
 NOTDEF-INE ;
 NOTDEF-ELA ;
 NOTDEF-ABE ;
 NOTDEF-TRA ;
 NOTDEF-CMP ;
 NOTDEF-PRL ;

LEXICON NMN_АНДЫ
	NMN_АНДЫ-SG	;
	NMN_АНДЫ-PL	;
	NMN_АНДЫ-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_АНДЫ-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM ;
!! Definite Sg
! SGCXDEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>вок K ;
! SG-NOM ;
!! Definite Sg
:й SGCXDEF ;
!! Possessor Indices
 SG-CX-PXSG1 ;
 SG-CX-PXSG2 ;
:й SG-CX-PXSG3 ;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_АНДЫ-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_АНДЫ-PL
!! Indefinite
!+Pl:в PL-NOM ;
!! Definite Pl
!+Pl:в PLCXDEF ;
+Pl:й        NMN-PL       ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_АНДЫ-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_АНДЫ-SG/PL
:й NOTDEF-GEN ;
 NOTDEF-DAT ;
 NOTDEF-ABL ;
 SP-ILL-INDEF_с ;
:й SP-ILL-PX_з ;
 NOTDEF-ILL ;
 NOTDEF-INE ;
 NOTDEF-ELA ;
 NOTDEF-ABE ;
 NOTDEF-TRA ;
 NOTDEF-CMP ;
 NOTDEF-PRL ;

LEXICON NMN_ВАЙ
!	NMN_ВАЙ-SG	;
!	NMN_ВАЙ-PL	;
!	NMN_ВАЙ-SG/PL	;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_ВАЙ-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM ;
!! Definite Sg
! SGCXDEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок:%>г%{АОЕ%} K ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_ВАЙ-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM ;
!! Definite Pl
! PLCXDEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_КАЛ
!	NMN_КАЛ-SG	;
!	NMN_КАЛ-PL	;
!	NMN_КАЛ-SG/PL	;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF_у ;
