src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
акшет:акш N_ОФТА-PL  "alusvaatteet" ;
алаба:алаба N_АВА_DIAL  "munakori" ;
алакша:алакша N_МОКША  "munanvalkuainen" ;
альгя:альгя N_ПАКСЯ  "aviomiehen vanhempi veli" ;
атля:атля N_АВА_DIAL  "ennen aikojaan vanhentunut" ;
афкст:афкс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
ашайка:ашайка N_АВА_DIAL  "" ;
брадрьвя:брад#Ъ2рьвя N_ВАЛЬМЯ  "" ;
вардоньзюра:вардонь#зюра N_ПУЛА  "belemniittipuikko" ;
вармауфафкс:вармауфафкс N_ОШ_DIAL  "kinos" ;
ваша:ваша N_МОКША  "varsa" ;
ваша:ваша N_МОКША  "(tekst.) jatkoloimi" ;
ведьлотка:ведьлотк N_ОФТА  "lammikko" ;
виреня:виреня N_ПАКСЯ  "" ;
вирняй:вирняй N_КАЛ_DIAL  "urpu" ;
вожият:вожия N_АВА-PL  "suitset" ;
всякайхть:всякай N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
вырезка:вырезка N_АВА  "" ;
вяжя:вяжя N_ПАКСЯ  "nuoremman veljen vaimo" ;
вяцемат:вяцема N_АВА-PL  "" ;
газет:газет N_КАЛ  "" ;
гарзи:гарзи N_АНДЫ  "" ;
гароз:гароз N_САРАЗ_DIAL  "villalanka" ;
гароз:гарос N_ОШ_DIAL  "villalanka" ;
дебярькс:дебярькс N_ОШ  "" ;
действительность:действительность N_КЯЛЬ  "" ;
дерьгаз:дерьгаз N_САРАЗ  "" ;
дёгай:дёгай N_ВАЙ  "" ;
жаряфкст:жаряфкс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
кайкф:кайкф N_КАЛ  "" ;
кайме:кайме N_СЕЛЬМЕ  "lapio" ;
калга:калг N_ПАНГА  "päistär" ;
каньфваста:каньф#васт N_ОФТА  "hamppupelto" ;
капуця:капуця N_АВА  "" ;
кару:кару N_КЕЛУ  "kärpänen" ;
карь:карь N_КЯЛЬ  "virsu" ;
карьпула:карь#пула N_ПУЛА  "virsun nauha" ;
карюцьке:карюцьк N_КАРЮЦЬКЕ  "" ;
каряз:каряз N_САРАЗ  "selkäranka" ;
карёлга:кар#ёлг N_ПАНГА  "" ;
кацяркст:кацяркс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
кенже:кенж N_ПИНГЕ  "kynsi" ;
кочкамат:кочкама N_АВА-PL  "vaalit" ;
кргакс+Use/SpellNoSugg:кЪ2ргакс N_ОШ  "talutin" ;
крёснай:крёснай N_ВАЙ  "kummi-" ;
ксты:ксты N_АНДЫ  "mansikka" ;
кудботма:куд#ботма N_СЕЛЬМЕ  "huoneen sisusta" ;
кудваста:куд#васт N_ОФТА  "asuinpaikka" ;
кула:кула N_ПУЛА  "ruumis" ;
куцю:куцю N_КЕЛУ  "lusikka" ;
кяжияма:кяжияма N_АВА  "suuttumus" ;
кярьге:кярьге N_СЕЛЬМЕ  "" ;
кяскавкурга:кяскав#кург N_ПАНГА  "säkinsuu" ;
лапаз:лапаз N_САРАЗ  "räystäs" ;
лача:лача N_МОКША  "" ;
лезгитт:лезгин N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
лезды:лезды N_АНДЫ  "" ;
лепе:лепе N_СЕЛЬМЕ  "leppä (Alnus)" ;
лифкст:лифкс N_ОШ-PL  "rokko" ;
локомотив:локомотив N_КАЛ  "" ;
лофца:лофца N_ПУЛА  "maito" ;
лёкша:лёкша N_МОКША  "" ;
мебель:мебель N_КЯЛЬ  "" ;
меню:меню N_КЕЛУ  "" ;
мирде:мирдь N_ПИНГЕ  "aviomies" ;
мокша:мокша N_МОКША  "mokšalainen" ;
нале:нале N_ПИНЕ  "kirjontakuvio mokšalaisen paidan helmassa" ;
нурда:нурда N_АВА  "reki" ;
нярькс:нярькс N_ОШ  "kuonokoppa" ;
озера:озера N_  "" ;
озксшуфта:озкс#шуфт N_ОФТА  "uhripuu" ;
оргат:орга N_АВА-PL  "hiiva" ;
осетитт:осетит N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
отбой:отбой N_ВАЙ  "" ;
паваз:паваз N_САРАЗ  "jumala" ;
пайге:пайг N_ПИНГЕ  "kello" ;
панга:панг N_ПАНГА  "sieni" ;
печать:печать N_КЯЛЬ  "leima" ;
пиле:пиле N_ПИНЕ  "korva" ;
пинжак:пинжак N_КАЛ  "pikkutakki" ;
пиче:пиче N_ТИШЕ  "mänty (Pinus silvestris)" ;
пичетише:пичетише N_ТИШЕ  "peltokorte (Equisetum arvense)" ;
посеп:посеп N_  "" ;
пресмыкающайхть:пресмыкающай N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
пурьге:пурьг N_ПИНГЕ  "home" ;
путы:путы N_АНДЫ  "" ;
пстердома:пстердома N_АВА  "" ;
пяле:пяле N_ПИНЕ  "puoli" ;
пянакудланга:пяна#куд#ланг N_ПАНГА  "uunin pankko" ;
пяштерькс:пяштерькс N_ОШ  "pähkinäpensas (Corylus avellana)" ;
розарий:розарий N_ВАЙ  "" ;
скобкат:скобка N_АВА-PL  "sulkeet" ;
смотренге+Use/SpellNoSugg:сЪ2мотренге N_  "" ;
сортише:сортише N_ТИШЕ  "rikkaruoho" ;
стряпама+Use/SpellNoSugg:сЪ2тряпама N_АВА  "" ;
стяфкст:стяфкс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
сувтише:сувтише N_ТИШЕ  "timotei" ;
сяре:сяре N_ПИНЕ  "" ;
сярхка:сярхк N_ОФТА  "saivar" ;
тип:тип N_  "" ;
тити:тити N_АНДЫ  "" ;
тише:тише N_ТИШЕ  "ruoho" ;
тнал+Use/SpellNoSugg:тЪ2нал N_КАЛ  "perhe" ;
тоду:тоду N_КЕЛУ  "tyyny" ;
тулгоз:тулгоз N_САРАЗ  "" ;
турнепс:турнепс N_ОШ  "rehujuurikas" ;
тяльме:тяльме N_СЕЛЬМЕ  "varpuluuta" ;
фата:фата N_  "huivi" ;
флигель:флигель N_КЯЛЬ  "" ;
цопадемат:цопадема N_АВА-PL  "" ;
шайба:шайба N_  "" ;
шары:шары N_АНДЫ  "pyörä" ;
шире:шире N_ПИНЕ  "puoli" ;
шпротт:шпрот N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
шудижу:шудижу N_КЕЛУ  "" ;
шяке:шяк N_ПИНГЕ  "talutin" ;
рьвя:Ъ2рьвя N_ВАЛЬМЯ  "" ;
рьвяяй:рьвяяй N_ВАЙ  "" ;
юроньбула:юронь#була N_ПУЛА  "korte (Equisetum)" ;
ётка:ётк N_ОФТА  "väli" ;
